test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishinaanibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: ibiitoosijiganishiniibaning
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: ibiitoosijiganishiniibanan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishiniibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: ibiitoosijiganishiwaaibaning
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: ibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanan
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishiwaaibanag
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: ibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: ibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     +PxIndefbiitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: ibiitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 6
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishini***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishini***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5, 7
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishiniing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishinian
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishiniing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishinian
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishiwaaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensimishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensimishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensimishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimish***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiminaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiminaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiminaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiminiibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiminiibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiminiibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensiminaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensiminaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensiminaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensiminiibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensiminiibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensiminiibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensimiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensishinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensishinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensishinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensishinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensishiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensishiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensishiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensishini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensishini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensishini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensishiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensishiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensishiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganimishinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganimishinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganimishinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimishinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganimishiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganimishiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganimishiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimishini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimishini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimishini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganimishiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganimishiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganimishiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     
